Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1303
Change of venue; transfer of prisoner.

When a court has ordered a change of venue, a warrant shall be issued by the clerk, directed to the sheriff, commanding him safely to convey the prisoner to the jail of the county where he is to be tried, there to be safely kept by the jailer thereof until discharged by due course of law.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 457, p. 824;

R.S.1913, § 9026;

C.S.1922, § 10050;

C.S.1929, § 29-1303;

R.S.1943, § 29-1303.

Upon change of venue, transfer of accused to jail of county where he is to be tried is provided. State v. Furstenau, 167 Neb. 439, 93 N.W.2d 384 (1958).